Washington statutes.
RCW 36.18.020

Clerk's fees, surcharges.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1207-S2.SL) ***

(1) Revenue collected under this section is subject to division with the state under RCW 36.18.025 and with the county or regional law library fund under RCW 27.24.070, except as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

(2) Clerks of superior courts shall collect the following fees for their official services:

(a) In addition to any other fee required by law, the party filing the first or initial document in any civil action, including, but not limited to an action for restitution, adoption, or change of name, and any party filing a counterclaim, cross-claim, or third-party claim in any such civil action, shall pay, at the time the document is filed, a fee of $200 except, in an unlawful detainer action under chapter 59.18 or 59.20 RCW for which the plaintiff shall pay a case initiating filing fee of $45, or in proceedings filed under RCW 28A.225.030 alleging a violation of the compulsory attendance laws where the petitioner shall not pay a filing fee. The $45 filing fee under this subsection for an unlawful detainer action shall not include an order to show cause or any other order or judgment except a default order or default judgment in an unlawful detainer action.

(b) Any party, except a defendant in a criminal case, filing the first or initial document on an appeal from a court of limited jurisdiction or any party on any civil appeal, shall pay, when the document is filed, a fee of $200.

(c) For filing of a petition for judicial review as required under RCW 34.05.514 a filing fee of $200.

(d) For filing of a petition for an antiharassment protection order under RCW 7.105.100 a filing fee of $53.

(e) For filing the notice of debt due for the compensation of a crime victim under RCW 7.68.120(2)(a) a fee of $200.

(f) In probate proceedings, the party instituting such proceedings, shall pay at the time of filing the first document therein, a fee of $200.

(g) For filing any petition to contest a will admitted to probate or a petition to admit a will which has been rejected, or a petition objecting to a written agreement or memorandum as provided in RCW 11.96A.220, there shall be paid a fee of $200.

(h) Upon conviction or plea of guilty, upon failure to prosecute an appeal from a court of limited jurisdiction as provided by law, or upon affirmance of a conviction by a court of limited jurisdiction, an adult defendant in a criminal case shall be liable for a fee of two hundred dollars, except this fee shall not be imposed on a defendant who is indigent as defined in RCW 10.01.160(3). Upon motion by the defendant, the court may waive or reduce any fee previously imposed under this subsection if the court finds that the defendant is indigent as defined in RCW 10.01.160(3).

(i) With the exception of demands for jury hereafter made and garnishments hereafter issued, civil actions and probate proceedings filed prior to midnight, July 1, 1972, shall be completed and governed by the fee schedule in effect as of January 1, 1972. However, no fee shall be assessed if an order of dismissal on the clerk's record be filed as provided by rule of the supreme court.

(3) No fee shall be collected when a petition for relinquishment of parental rights is filed pursuant to RCW 26.33.080 or for forms and instructional brochures provided under RCW 7.105.115.

(4) No fee shall be collected when an abstract of judgment is filed by the county clerk of another county for the purposes of collection of legal financial obligations.

(5)(a) In addition to the fees required to be collected under this section, clerks of the superior courts must collect surcharges as provided in this subsection (5) of which 75 percent must be remitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial stabilization trust account and 25 percent must be retained by the county.

(b) On filing fees required to be collected under subsection (2)(b) of this section, a surcharge of $30 must be collected.

(c) On all filing fees required to be collected under this section, except for fees required under subsection (2)(b), (d), and (h) of this section, a surcharge of $40 must be collected.

[ 2022 c 260 s 17. Prior: 2021 c 303 s 3; 2021 c 215 s 146; 2018 c 269 s 17; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 2 s 3; 2015 c 265 s 28; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 3; 2012 c 199 s 3; 2011 1st sp.s. c 44 s 5; prior: 2009 c 572 s 4; 2009 c 479 s 21; 2009 c 417 s 3; prior: 2005 c 457 s 19; 2005 c 374 s 5; 2000 c 9 s 1; 1999 c 42 s 635; 1996 c 211 s 2; prior: 1995 c 312 s 70; 1995 c 292 s 10; 1993 c 435 s 1; 1992 c 54 s 1; 1989 c 342 s 1; prior: 1987 c 382 s 3; 1987 c 202 s 201; 1987 c 56 s 3; prior: 1985 c 24 s 1; 1985 c 7 s 104; 1984 c 263 s 29; 1981 c 330 s 5; 1980 c 70 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 107 s 1; 1975 c 30 s 1; 1973 c 16 s 1; 1973 c 38 s 1; prior: 1972 ex.s. c 57 s 5; 1972 ex.s. c 20 s 1; 1970 ex.s. c 32 s 1; 1967 c 26 s 9; 1963 c 4 s 36.18.020; prior: 1961 c 304 s 1; 1961 c 41 s 1; 1951 c 51 s 5; 1907 c 56 s 1, part, p 89; 1903 c 151 s 1, part, p 294; 1893 c 130 s 1, part, p 421; Code 1881 s 2086, part, p 355; 1869 p 364 s 1, part; 1863 p 391 s 1, part; 1861 p 34 s 1, part; 1854 p 368 s 1, part; RRS s 497, part.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. RAP 14.3, 18.22.

Construction—Effective date—2022 c 260: See notes following RCW 3.66.120.

Effective date—2021 c 303: See note following RCW 3.62.060.

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.

Construction—2018 c 269: See note following RCW 10.82.090.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 2: See note following RCW 3.62.060.

Finding—Intent—2015 c 265: See note following RCW 13.50.010.

Effective date—2013 2nd sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 3.62.060.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 44: See note following RCW 3.62.020.

Effective date—2009 c 572: See note following RCW 43.79.505.

Effective date—2009 c 479: See note following RCW 2.56.030.

Intent—2005 c 457: See note following RCW 43.08.250.

Effective date—1999 c 42: See RCW 11.96A.902.

Short title—1995 c 312: See note following RCW 13.32A.010.

Effective date—1992 c 54: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect April 1, 1992." [ 1992 c 54 s 7.]

Effective date—1989 c 342: See RCW 59.18.911.

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

Severability—1981 c 330: See note following RCW 3.62.060.

Effective date—1972 ex.s. c 20: "This act shall take effect July 1, 1972." [ 1972 ex.s. c 20 s 3.]

Effective date—1967 c 26: See note following RCW 43.70.150.